Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1903
Award, defined.

Award means a grant of money by the commission to an eligible
student for educational expenses. An award shall not exceed fifty percent of the tuition and mandatory
fees for a full-time, resident, undergraduate student for the last completed
award year at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1107, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 962, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 43;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB331, § 1.